src/assets/uz-lat.aff
SFX X 0 maydiganimdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganini [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganinimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganinidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganini-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganinidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganinimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganini-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganining [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganiningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganiningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganining-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganiningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganiningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganining-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganiga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganigami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganigadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganiga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganigadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganigamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganiga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganida [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganida-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganidamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganida-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimiznimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimiznidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimiznidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimiznimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizning [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizgami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizgadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizgadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganimizda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingiznimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingiznidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingiznidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingiznimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizning [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizgami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizgadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizgadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganingizda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimnimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimnidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimnidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimnimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimning [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimgami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimgadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimgadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarini [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarinimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarinidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarini-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarinidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarinimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarini-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarining [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarining-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarining-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarigami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarigadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarigadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarigamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlariga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarida [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarida-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaridamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarida-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimiznimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimiznidir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizni-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimiznidir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimiznimikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizni-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizning [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizningmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizningdir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizning-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizningdir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizningmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizning-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizga [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizgami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizgadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizga-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizgadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizgamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizga-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdandir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdandir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizda [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdami [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdadir [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizda-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdadir-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizdamikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlarimizda-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringizni [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringiznimi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 maydiganlaringiznidir [^aeiou]
